scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_am.yaml
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaaweba'aan
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaaweba'ang
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaaweba'ang
     agwaaweba'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaaweba'an
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaawebinaan
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwaawebinaan
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaawebinaan
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaawebinaan
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaawebinang
     agwaawebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaawebinang
     agwaawebinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaawebinan 
     agwaayoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indagwaayoondaan
     agwaayoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaayoondaan
     agwaayoondan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaayoondang
     agwaayoondan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaayoondan
     ajidakiiwebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indajidakiiwebinaan
     ajidakiiwebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odajidakiiwebinaan
     ajidakiiwebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ajidakiiwebinang
     ajidakiiwebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ejidakiiwebinang
     ajidakiiwebinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ajidakiiwebinan
     ajidinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indajidinaan
     ajidinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindajidinaan
     ajidinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidajidinaan
     ajidinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odajidinaan
     ajidinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ajidinang
     ajidinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ejidinang
     ajidinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ajidinan
     ajijiwebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindajijiwebinaan
     ajijiwebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odajijiwebinaan
     ajijiwebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ajijiwebinang
     ajijiwebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ejijiwebinang
     ajijiwebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: ajijiwebinan
     akawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indakawaabandaan
     akawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakawaabandaan
     akawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidakawaabandaan
     akawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakawaabandaan
     akawaabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akawaabandang
     akawaabandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekawaabandang
     akawaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akawaabandan 
     akwaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwaabandaan
     akwaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaabandaan
     akwaabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaabandang
     akwaabandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaabandang
     akwaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaabandan
     akwaabiigizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwaabiigizhaan
     akwaabiigizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaabiigizhaan
     akwaabiigizhan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaabiigizhang
     akwaabiigizhan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaabiigizhang
     akwaabiigizhan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaabiigizhan
     akwaandawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indakwaandawaadaan
     akwaandawaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaandawaadaan
     akwaandawaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaandawaadang
     akwaandawaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaandawaadang
     akwaandawaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaandawaadan 
     akwaandawedaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indakwaandawedaabaadaan
     akwaandawedaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwaandawedaabaadaan
     akwaandawedaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwaandawedaabaadang
     akwaandawedaabaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwaandawedaabaadang
     akwaandawedaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwaandawedaabaadan
     akwegizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindakwegizhaan
     akwegizhan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odakwegizhaan
     akwegizhan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: akwegizhang
     akwegizhan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ekwegizhang
     akwegizhan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akwegizhan
     amanisodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indamanisodaan
     amanisodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odamanisodaan
     amanisodan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: amanisodang
     amanisodan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: emanisodang
     anaamendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanaamendaan
     anaamendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanaamendaan
     anaamendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanaamendaan
     anaamendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanaamendaan
     anaamendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaamendang
     anaamendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enaamendang
     anaamendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anaamendan
     andawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandawaabandaan
     andawaabandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandawaabandaan
     andawaabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andawaabandang
     andawaabandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endawaabandang
     andawaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andawaabandan
     andawaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0: andawaabandamok
     andawaabandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+Incl+3Sg: andawaabandandaa
     andawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandawendaan
     andawendan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandawendaan
     andawendan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andawendang
     andawendan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endawendang
     andawendan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andawendan
     andodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandodaan
     andodan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandodaan
     andodan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andodang
     andodan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endodang
     andodan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andodan
     andoganaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandoganaandaan
     andoganaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandoganaandaan
     andoganaandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andoganaandang
     andoganaandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endoganaandang
     andoganaandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andoganaandan
     andomaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandomaandaan
     andomaandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandomaandaan
     andomaandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andomaandang
     andomaandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endomaandang
     andomaandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andomaandan
     andone'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandone'aan
     andone'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandone'aan
     andone'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andone'ang
     andone'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endone'ang
     andone'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andone'an
     andotan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandotaan
     andotan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandotaan
     andotan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andotang
     andotan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endotang
     andotan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andotan
     andoobiigandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandoobiigandaan
     andoobiigandan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandoobiigandaan
     andoobiigandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andoobiigandang
     andoobiigandan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endoobiigandang
     andoobiigandan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andoobiigandan
     andoojii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandoojii'aan
     andoojii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3Sg: onandojii'aan
     andoojii'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andoojii'ang
     andoojii'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endoojii'ang
     andoojii'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andoojii'an
     andoojiinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandoojiinaan
     andoojiinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandoojiinaan
     andoojiinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andoojiinang
     andoojiinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endoojiinang
     andoojiinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andoojiinan
     andoojiishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandoojiishkaan
     andoojiishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandoojiishkaan
     andoojiishkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andoojiishkang
     andoojiishkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endoojiishkang
     andoojiishkan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andoojiishkan
     andwaanikaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandwaanikaadaan
     andwaanikaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandwaanikaadaan
     andwaanikaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andwaanikaadang
     andwaanikaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endwaanikaadang
     andwaanikaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andwaanikaadan
     andwaawanga'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandwaawanga'aan
     andwaawanga'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+0Sg: onandwaawanga'aan
     andwaawanga'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andwaawanga'ang
     andwaawanga'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endwaawanga'ang
     andwaawanga'an+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andwaawanga'an
     angoshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indangoshkaan
     angoshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindangoshkaan
     angoshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidangoshkaan
     angoshkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odangoshkaan
     angoshkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: angoshkang
     angoshkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: engoshkang
     angoshkan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: angoshkan 
     angwaakizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indangwaakizaan
     angwaakizan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odangwaakizaan
     angwaakizan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: angwaakizang
     angwaakizan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: engwaakizang
     angwaakizan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: angwaakizan
     anibenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanibenaan
     anibenan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanibenaan
     anibenan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anibenang
     anibenan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enibenang
     anibenan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anibenan
     anibewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanibewebinaan
     anibewebinan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanibewebinaan
     anibewebinan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anibewebinang
     anibewebinan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enibewebinang
     anibewebinan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: anibewebinan
     anibewebishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanibewebishkaan
     anibewebishkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anibewebishkang
     anibewebishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanibewebishkaan
     anibewebishkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enibewebishkang
     anibewebishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: anibewebishkan
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimibatwaadaan
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimibatwaadaan
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimibatwaadaan
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimibatwaadaan
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animibatwaadang
     animibatwaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimibatwaadang
     animibatwaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animibatwaadan
     animidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimidaabaadaan
     animidaabaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimidaabaadaan
     animidaabaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animidaabaadang
     animidaabaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimidaabaadang
     animidaabaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animidaabaadan
     animikonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimikonaan
     animikonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimikonaan
     animikonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimikonaan
     animikonan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimikonaan
     animikonan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animikonang
     animikonan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimikonang
     animikonan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animikonan 
     animikowebishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimikowebishkaan
     animikowebishkan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimikowebishkaan
     animikowebishkan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animikowebishkang
     animikowebishkan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimikowebishkang
     animikowebishkan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animikowebishkan
     animinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaniminigaadaan
     animinigaadan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaniminigaadaan
     animinigaadan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animinigaadang
     animinigaadan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: eniminigaadang
     animinigaadan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animinigaadan
     animoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanimoondaan
     animoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanimoondaan
     animoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanimoondaan
     animoondan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanimoondaan
     animoondan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: animoondang
     animoondan+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enimoondang
     animoondan+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: animoondan
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indanishinaabewibii'aan
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindanishinaabewibii'aan
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidanishinaabewibii'aan
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odanishinaabewibii'aan
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: anishinaabewibii'ang
     anishinaabewibii'an+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: enishinaabewibii'ang
